North Carolina, session 2025, SB228.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1C reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1C. Disabled veteran property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The first forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000) of appraised value of the residence is excluded from taxation. A qualifying owner who
receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other property tax relief. The amount
excluded from taxation is as follows:
(1) Disabled veteran exclusion. – For a disabled veteran, the exclusion amount is
the product of (i) the appraised value of the residence and (ii) the percentage
of the qualifying owner's disability rating, as determined by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs.
(2) Surviving spouse exclusion. – For the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran,
the exclusion amount is equal to the greater of (i) the amount excluded under
subdivision (1) of this subsection as of the date of the disabled veteran's death
or (ii) the first forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) of appraised value of the
permanent residence, provided that the applicant establishes eligibility for
such exclusion by providing certification from the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs that, as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which
the exclusion is claimed, the veteran's death was the result of a
service-connected condition.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Disabled veteran. – A veteran of any branch of the Armed Forces of the United
States whose character of service at separation was honorable or under
honorable conditions and who satisfies one of the following requirements:has
received a certification by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
indicating that, as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the
exclusion allowed by this section is claimed, the veteran has been assigned a
disability rating of fifty percent (50%) or greater for a service-connected
condition.
*S228-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. As of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion
allowed by this section is claimed, the veteran had received benefits
under 38 U.S.C. § 2101.
b. The veteran has received a certification by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or another federal agency indicating
that, as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion
allowed by this section is claimed, he or she has a service-connected,
permanent, and total disability.
c. The veteran is deceased and the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or another federal agency has certified that, as of January 1
preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion allowed by this
section is claimed, the veteran's death was the result of a
service-connected condition.
…
(e) Other Multiple Owners. – This subsection applies to co-owners who are not husband
and wife. Each co-owner of a permanent residence must apply separately for the exclusion
allowed under this section.
When one or more co-owners of a permanent residence qualify for the exclusion allowed
under this section and none of the co-owners qualifies for the exclusion allowed under
G.S. 105-277.1, each co-owner is entitled to the full amount of the exclusion allowed under this
section. The exclusion allowed to one co-owner may not exceed the co-owner's proportionate
share of the valuation of the property, and the amount of the exclusion allowed to all the
co-owners may not exceed the exclusion allowed under this section.property.
When one or more co-owners of a permanent residence qualify for the exclusion allowed
under this section and one or more of the co-owners qualify for the exclusion allowed under
G.S. 105-277.1, each co-owner who qualifies for the exclusion allowed under this section is
entitled to the full amount of the exclusion. The exclusion allowed to one co-owner may not
exceed the co-owner's proportionate share of the valuation of the property, and the amount of the
exclusion allowed to all the co-owners may not exceed the greater of the exclusion allowed under
this section and the exclusion allowed under G.S. 105-277.1.
(f) Application. – An application for the exclusion allowed under this section should be
filed during the regular listing period, but may be filed and must be accepted at any time up to
and through June 1 preceding the tax year for which the exclusion is claimed. An applicant for
an exclusion under this section must establish eligibility for the exclusion by providing a copy of
the veteran's disability certification or evidence of benefits received under 38 U.S.C. §
2101.certification."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 228-First Edition